Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.0903

Power of legal representative of deceased member.

If a member dies, the deceased member's legal representative may exercise for the purposes of settling the estate, the rights the deceased member had under RCW 23.100.0405.

[ 2019 c 37 s 903.]